Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.029

Application of Uniform Disciplinary Act.

The Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses and interim permits, and the discipline of licensees and holders of interim permits under this chapter.

[ 1993 c 133 s 2; 1987 c 150 s 47; 1986 c 259 s 123.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.